Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.825

Institutional student loan fund for needy students.

The board of trustees or regents of each of the state's colleges or universities may allocate from services and activities fees an amount not to exceed one dollar per quarter or one dollar and fifty cents per semester to an institutional student loan fund for needy students, to be administered by such rules or regulations as the board of trustees or regents may adopt: PROVIDED, That loans from such funds shall not be made for terms exceeding twelve months, and the true annual rate of interest charged shall be six percent.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.

Colleges and universities defined: RCW 28B.15.005.